Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-720
Commission; complaints and requests; form.

Complaints and requests to the Commission on Judicial Qualifications shall be in writing directed to the commission or to any member of the commission. No specified form of complaint or request shall be required.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 6, p. 432;

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 5.